Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-107
Corporate name; service of process.

The corporate name of each city of the primary class shall be The City of ............. . All process affecting any such city shall be served in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 7, p. 73;

R.S.1913, § 4410;

C.S.1922, § 3786;

C.S.1929, § 15-107;

R.S.1943, § 15-107;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 4.